Wyoming, session 2026, HB0168.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 27-14-208 is created to read:

27-14-208. Experience ratings; prohibition;
penalties; definitions.

HB0168

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0420
(a) As used in this section, "experience rating"
means a rating procedure used by the division to set
worker's compensation premiums that utilizes the past
claims experience of an employer to forecast future losses
associated with that specific employer. For purposes of
this subsection, the calculation of the rating includes
calculations where the employer's claims experience is
measured against the claims experience of employers in the
same classification, producing a prospective premium
credit, debit or unity modification. For purposes of
employment, "experience rating" shall not be considered a
reflection of an employer's safety record.

(b) Except for litigation purposes and for actions by
the division related to the operation of the worker's
compensation system, the following actions are prohibited:

(i) Requesting a person's experience rating for
the purpose of determining the person's employment safety
record;

(ii) Regarding any construction project taking
place in this state, requesting an experience rating in
HB0168

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0420
order to obtain the safety record of any contractor or
supplier, regardless of whether the contractor or supplier
is domiciled within the state.

Section 2. W.S. 27-14-201(d) and by creating an new
subsection (w) is amended to read:

27-14-201. Rates and classifications; rate surcharge.

(d) In addition, the plan of rating shall use an
experience rating system based on three (3) years claim
experience, or as much thereof as is available, for
employers enrolled under it. This system shall reward
employers with a better than average claim experience,
penalize employers with a worse than average claim
experience and may provide for premium volume discount so
long as the account remains actuarially sound. Discounts
from or penalties added to base employment classification
rates because of claim experience shall not exceed
sixty-five percent (65%) for rates through calendar year
2016 and shall not exceed eighty-five percent (85%) for
rates beginning with calendar year 2017. An employer who is
current on premium payments required by this act may apply
HB0168

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0420
to the division for a determination of experience
modification rating chargeability for an injury to the
employer's employee. The division's determination of
chargeability shall be reviewable as provided in W.S.
27-14-601(k)(iii) and (iv). If the division, by a
preponderance of the evidence, determines that an
employee's injury was primarily caused by a third party,
the injury shall not be charged to the employer's account.
The employer shall bear the burden of proof in any action
brought by the employer for a chargeability determination.
If an employer's account is determined to be unchargeable
under this subsection, the employer's account shall not be
further credited upon recovery from a third party by the
division. The division shall by rule and regulation
establish necessary procedures for a determination of
chargeability. Any determination by the division regarding
causation of an injury pursuant to this subsection shall be
used only for ratemaking purposes and shall not be
admissible in any civil litigation regarding the injury.

(w) The division shall make a determination of
experience rating chargeability within fifteen (15) days of
the filing of a report of injury or within forty-five (45)
HB0168

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0420
days after the division's issuance of a request for
additional information, if the additional information is
provided in a timely manner. The division's determination
of chargeability shall be reviewable as provided by W.S.
27-14-601(k)(iii) and (iv). If the division determines that
an employee's injury was primarily caused by a third party,
the injury shall not be charged to the employer's account.
If an employer's account is determined to be unchargeable
under this subsection, the employer's account shall not be
further credited upon recovery from a third party by the
division. If a written request for hearing on the issue of
chargeability is not filed within fifteen (15) days of a
determination of chargeability, and information not
available at the time of the initial chargeability
determination shows that an employee's injury was primarily
caused by a third party, an employer who is current on
premium payments required by this act may apply to the
division for a redetermination of experience rating
chargeability for an injury to the employer's employee not
more than one (1) year after the date of an original
determination. The employer shall bear the burden of proof
in any action brought by the employer for a chargeability
determination. The division shall promulgate rules to
HB0168

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0420
establish necessary procedures for a determination of
chargeability. Any determination by the division regarding
causation of an injury pursuant to this section shall be
used only for ratemaking purposes and shall not be
admissible in any civil litigation regarding the injury.

Section 3. This act shall not be construed to impair
any contract or agreement involving experience ratings
entered into before July 1, 2026.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0168